Colorado statutes. TITLE 19 Children's Code
SUBPART A
IN GENERAL

19-2.5-1501. Division of youth services - created - interagency agreements - duties of administrators of facilities in connection with voter registration and casting of ballots - reports - definitions.

There is created within the department of human services the division of youth services, referred to within this section as the "division", the head of which is the director of the division. The executive director of the department of human services shall
appoint the director of the division pursuant to section 13 of article XII of the state constitution and the laws and rules governing the state personnel system. The director is a type 2 entity, as defined in section
24-1-105, who exercises the director's powers and performs the director's duties and functions within the office of the executive director of the department of human services in accordance with this article 2.5.

The purposes of the division are to:

Increase public safety by providing rehabilitative treatment to help youth in the division's care make lasting behavioral changes to prepare themselves for successful transition back to the community;

Promote the physical safety of youth and staff within the division;

Promote a seamless continuum of care from the time of detention or commitment to discharge, in which youths' needs are met in a safe, structured environment with well-trained, caring staff who help youth identify and address their issues, be accountable,
and accept responsibility for their actions;

Enable youth to develop healthy, supportive relationships with peers, adults, family, and members of their neighborhoods and communities; and

Provide youth with the tools necessary to become law-abiding, contributing members of the community upon their release.

The division may enter into agreements with the judicial department to combine provision of juvenile parole and probation services. Juvenile probation and parole supervision programs implemented pursuant to such agreements may not include provisions for
supervision of juveniles sentenced to the department of corrections.

This subsection (3) applies to any individual committed to a juvenile facility and in the custody of the division who is eighteen years of age or older on the date of the next election.

The administrator of a facility in which an individual described in subsection (3)(a) of this section is committed shall facilitate the voting rights of the individual. In connection with such requirements, the administrator shall provide the individual
with information regarding voting rights and how to register to vote and cast a mail ballot, provide the individual with voter information materials upon the individual's request, and ensure that any mail ballot cast
by the individual is timely delivered to the designated election official. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, to satisfy the requirements of this subsection (3)(b), the administrator is exempt from any restriction
under law on the number of mail ballots an eligible elector may deliver in person to the designated election official.

The administrator and the secretary of state shall post the type or kind of verification satisfying the requirements of section 1-1-104 (19.5)(d) in a prominent place on the public websites maintained by the department of human services and the secretary,
respectively. The secretary shall provide notice to the county clerk and recorders as well as other designated election officials throughout the state that such verification constitutes an acceptable form of identification
pursuant to section 1-1-104 (19.5) permitting the individuals possessing such identification to register to vote and cast a ballot.

The administrator shall forward applications made pursuant to this subsection (3) on a weekly basis, or on a daily basis during the last week allowed for registration prior to any election, to the county clerk and recorder of the county in which the facility
is located, and, if the applicant resides in a different county from the facility, the application must then be forwarded to the county clerk and recorder of the county in which the applicant resides.

For purposes of this subsection (3), "administrator" and "voter information materials" have the same meaning as set forth in section 1-2-210.5 (5).

On or before July 1, 2018, and on or before each July 1 thereafter, the department of human services shall collect recidivism data and calculate the recidivism rates and the educational outcomes for juveniles committed to the custody of the department
of human services who complete their parole sentences and discharge from department supervision. In collecting the recidivism data, the department of human services shall include any juvenile adjudication or adult conviction
of a criminal offense within three years after parole discharge. Notwithstanding section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), the department of human services shall report the recidivism data, recidivism rates, and educational outcomes to
the general assembly annually. The report must denote the demographic characteristics of the population considered in the report. In reporting on recidivism rates, the report must denote the types of criminal offenses committed,
delineating between felonies and misdemeanors and between crimes that are included as a "crime" pursuant to section 24-4.1-302 (1) and other crimes.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 687, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2022:
(1)(a) amended, (SB 22-162), ch. 469, p. 3375, § 65, effective August 10.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-203 as it existed prior to 2021.

Cross references:
For the short title (the "Debbie Haskins 'Administrative Organization Act of 1968' Modernization Act") in SB 22-162, see section 1 of chapter 469, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

19-2.5-1502. Human services facilities - authority.

The department of human services shall establish and operate facilities necessary for the care, education, training, treatment, and rehabilitation of juveniles legally committed to its custody pursuant to section 19-2.5-1127 or 19-2.5-1103. As necessary
and when money is available for such purposes, the facilities may include but are not limited to:

Group care facilities and homes, including halfway houses, nonresidential transition programs, day reporting and day treatment centers, and staff secure facilities;

Training schools;

Conservation camps;

Diagnostic and evaluation centers and receiving centers; and

Any programs necessary to implement the purposes of this section for juveniles in community placement.

The department of human services shall cooperate with other governmental units and agencies, including appropriate local units of government, state departments and institutions, and agencies of the federal government in order to facilitate youth training
and rehabilitation.

Once a juvenile is committed to the department of human services, the juvenile shall remain in a facility directly operated by the department of human services or in a secure facility contracted for by the department of human services until the juvenile's
commitment expires as provided by law, parole status is granted pursuant to part 12 of this article 2.5, or a community placement is approved by order of the juvenile court and by a juvenile community review board, if one exists
in the county of proposed placement.

The department of human services shall contract with the department of corrections to house in an appropriate facility operated by the department of human services and, as appropriate, to provide services to any juvenile under the age of fourteen years
who is sentenced as an adult to the department of corrections. On reaching fourteen years of age, any juvenile sentenced to the department of corrections shall be transferred to an appropriate facility operated by the department
of corrections for the completion of the juvenile's sentence.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 689, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-403 as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-1503. Eminent domain - detention facility site.

Subject to the provisions of subsection (2) of this section, the department of human services has the right to acquire by eminent domain any real property that is located within the Denver metropolitan area that is necessary for the establishment of one
or more juvenile detention facilities. Such real property must be acquired in accordance with articles 1 to 7 of title 38.

Any real property specified in subsection (1)(a) of this section that is already devoted to a public use may be acquired by the department of human services pursuant to this section; except that property owned by the federal government may not be acquired
without the consent of the federal government.

Prior to the acquisition of any real property pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the joint budget committee, established pursuant to section 2-3-201, must review and approve the proposed acquisition.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 690, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-403.5 as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-1504. Facility directors - duties.

The director of the division of youth services shall appoint a director of each state-operated facility established by section 19-2.5-1502 and sections 19-2.5-1527 to 19-2.5-1529 pursuant to section 13 of article XII of the state constitution.

It is the duty of the director of each facility established by section 19-2.5-1502 and sections 19-2.5-1527 to 19-2.5-1529 to:

Report to the executive director of the department of human services at such times and on such matters as the director may require;

Receive juveniles committed to the custody of the department of human services and placed in the director's care pursuant to this article 2.5 and to keep them for rehabilitation, education, and training until discharged by law or pursuant to the rules
of the department of human services or released on parole;

Make a careful and thorough evaluation, at intervals no greater than six months, of every juvenile placed under the director's care. The purpose of each evaluation is to ascertain whether:

The juvenile's program should be modified;

The juvenile's transfer to another facility should be recommended to the director; or

The juvenile's release should be recommended to the juvenile parole board;

Take such measures as are necessary to prevent recruitment of new gang members from among the juveniles committed to the custody of the department of human services.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 691, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-205 as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-1505. Juvenile facility employees - rules.

On and after April 1, 2004, the department of human services shall not hire a person who is required to register as a sex offender pursuant to the "Colorado Sex Offender Registration Act", article 22 of title 16, to work at a juvenile facility.

The department of human services shall ensure that any person who is employed to work at a juvenile facility as of April 1, 2004, and who is required to register as a sex offender pursuant to the "Colorado Sex Offender Registration Act", article 22 of
title 16, does not have unsupervised contact with a juvenile in the facility on and after April 1, 2004.

If a person, while employed by the department of human services, is convicted of an offense that requires the employee to register as a sex offender pursuant to the "Colorado Sex Offender Registration Act", article 22 of title 16, the employee shall immediately
notify the department of human services of the conviction and the registration requirement. The department of human services shall ensure that the employee does not have unsupervised contact with a juvenile in the facility
on and after the date it receives notice pursuant to this subsection (3).

The executive director of the department of human services shall adopt such rules as may be necessary to ensure compliance with the requirements of this section.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 692, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-403.3 as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-1506. Detention center sexual assault prevention program - reports.

The division of youth services created in section 19-2.5-1501 shall develop, with respect to sexual assaults that occur in juvenile facilities, policies and procedures to:

Require disciplinary action for employees who fail to report incidences of sexual assault to the inspector general;

Require the inspector general, after completing an investigation for sexual assault, to submit the findings to the district attorney with jurisdiction over the facility in which the alleged sexual assault occurred;

Prohibit retaliation and disincentives for reporting sexual assaults;

Provide, in situations in which there is reason to believe that a sexual assault has occurred, reasonable and appropriate measures to ensure victim safety by separating the victim from the assailant, if known;

Ensure the confidentiality of prison rape complaints and protection of juveniles who make complaints of prison rape;

Provide acute trauma care for sexual assault victims, including treatment of injuries, HIV prophylaxis measures, and testing for sexually transmitted infections;

Provide, at intake and periodically thereafter, division-of-youth-services-approved, easy-to-understand information developed by the division of youth services on sexual assault prevention, treatment, reporting, and counseling in consultation with community
groups with expertise in sexual assault prevention, treatment, reporting, and counseling;

Provide sexual-assault-specific training to division of youth services mental health professionals and all employees who have direct contact with juveniles regarding treatment and methods of prevention and investigation;

Provide confidential mental health counseling to victims of sexual assault;

Monitor victims of sexual assault for suicidal impulses, post-traumatic stress disorder, depression, and other mental health consequences resulting from the sexual assault; and

Require termination of an employee who engages in a sexual assault on or sexual conduct with a juvenile consistent with constitutional due process protections and state personnel system laws and rules.

Investigators trained in the investigation of sex crimes shall investigate allegations of sexual assault. The investigation must include, but need not be limited to, use of forensic rape kits, questioning of suspects and witnesses, and gathering and preserving
relevant evidence.

The division of youth services shall annually report the data that it is required to compile and report to the federal bureau of justice statistics as required by the federal "Prison Rape Elimination Act of 2003", Pub.L. 108-79, as amended, to the judiciary
committees of the house of representatives and the senate, or any successor committees. Notwithstanding section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I) to the contrary, the reporting requirements in this subsection (3) continue indefinitely.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 692, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2022:
IP(1) amended, (SB 22-212), ch. 421, p. 2972, § 39, effective August 10.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-214 as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-1507. Facilities - control and restraint - liability - duty to pursue runaways.

Any facility that houses or provides nonresidential services to adjudicated juveniles pursuant to this article 2.5, whether publicly or privately operated, for short-term or long-term commitment or detention is authorized to respond in a reasonable manner
to issues of control and restraint of adjudicated juveniles when necessary. Each facility or program shall establish clearly defined policies and procedures for the short-term restraint and control of adjudicated juveniles
housed within the facility or receiving services in the nonresidential program.

Any facility that houses or provides nonresidential services to adjudicated juveniles pursuant to this article 2.5 and any person employed by the facility or program is not liable for damages arising from acts committed in the good-faith implementation
of this section; except that the facility or program and any person employed by the facility or program may be liable for acts that are committed in a willful and wanton manner.

Any facility that houses adjudicated juveniles pursuant to this article 2.5 has a duty to notify the court and the local law enforcement agency as soon as possible after discovering that an adjudicated juvenile housed at the facility has run away.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 694, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-404 as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-1508. Out-of-home placement - runaways - duty to notify.

When a juvenile who is sentenced to detention, committed to the department of human services, or otherwise sentenced or placed in out-of-home placement pursuant to section 19-2.5-1103 runs away from the facility or home in which the juvenile is placed,
the person in charge of the facility or the foster parent shall notify the court and the local law enforcement agency as soon as possible after discovering that the juvenile has run away from the facility or home.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 694, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-920 as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-1509. Administration or monitoring of medications to persons in juvenile institutional facilities.

The executive director of the department of human services has the power to direct the administration or monitoring of medications to persons in juvenile institutional facilities, as defined in section 25-1.5-301 (2)(b), in a manner consistent with part
3 of article 1.5 of title 25.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 694, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-416 as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-1510. Facility publications.

Publications of any of the facilities established pursuant to section 19-2.5-1502 and sections 19-2.5-1527 to 19-2.5-1529 intended for circulation in quantity outside such facility is subject to the "Information Coordination Act", section 24-1-136.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 694, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-413 as it existed prior to 2021.